Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-637
Moped, defined.

Moped shall mean a device with fully operative pedals for propulsion by human power, an automatic transmission, and a motor with a cylinder capacity not exceeding fifty cubic centimeters which produces no more than two brake horsepower and is capable of propelling the device at a maximum design speed of no more than thirty miles per hour on level ground.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 133;

Laws 2015, LB95, § 11.